District of Columbia statutes.
2-321.01

Transferred

Deadline for appointment of Inspector General.

Recodified as §. 1-301.115b.

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 151, Pub. L. 104-8, § 303(e)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 782, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11711(b)